en: Geese legs
fr: Cuisses d'oie

en: Frozen geese legs
fr: Cuisses d'oie surgelées

en: Frozen goose, frozen goose meat
fr: Oie entière surgelée

en: Goose neck
fr: Cou d'oie

en: Frozen goose neck
fr: Cou d'oie surgelé

en: Geese wings
fr: Ailes d'oies

en: Frozen geese wings
fr: Ailes d'oies surgelées

en: Goose breasts
fr: Magrets d'oies

en: Frozen Goose breasts
fr: Magrets d'oies surgelées

en: Geese feet
fr: Pattes d'oies

en: Frozen geese feet
fr: Pattes d'oies surgelées

en: Roasted goose meat, Baked goose meat
fr: Viande d'oie rôtie, Viande d'oie cuite au four

en: Roasted goose with meat and skin, Baked goose with meat and skin
fr: Oie rôtie avec viande et peau, Oie cuite au four avec viande et peau

en: Goose confits
fr: Confits d’oie, Confit d’oie

en: Guinea fowl
fr: Pintades, Pintade
hr: Biserke
nl: Parelhoenders

en: Guinea fowl leg
fr: cuisse de pintade

en: Guinea fowl breast
fr: poitrine de pintade

en: Chicken and its products
ca: Pollastre i derivats
es: Pollo y sus productos
fr: Poulet et dérivés
hr: Piletine i njenih proizvoda
nl: Kip en afgeleide producten
zh: 鸡肉及其制品

en: Marinated chicken meats
fr: Viandes de poulet marinées

en: Marinated chicken breasts
fr: Filets de poulet marinés